Washington statutes.
RCW 24.06.475

Interrogatories by secretary of state.

The secretary of state may propound to any corporation, domestic or foreign, subject to the provisions of this chapter, and to any officer or director thereof such interrogatories as may be reasonably necessary and proper to enable the secretary of state to ascertain whether such corporation has complied with all of the provisions of this chapter applicable to such corporation. All such interrogatories shall be answered within thirty days after the mailing thereof, or within such additional time as shall be fixed by the secretary of state, and the answers thereto shall be full and complete, made in writing, and under oath. If such interrogatories are directed to an individual, they shall be answered personally by him or her, and if directed to the corporation they shall be answered by the president, a vice president, a secretary or any assistant secretary thereof. The secretary of state need not file any document to which such interrogatories relate until such interrogatories are answered as required by this section, and even not then if the answers thereto disclose that the document is not in conformity with the provisions of this chapter.

The secretary of state shall certify to the attorney general, for such action as the attorney general may deem appropriate, all interrogatories and answers thereto which disclose a violation of any of the provisions of this chapter.

[ 2011 c 336 s 670; 1982 c 35 s 157; 1969 ex.s. c 120 s 95.]

NOTES:

Intent—Severability—Effective dates—Application—1982 c 35: See notes following RCW 43.07.160.